North Carolina statutes. Chapter 75A. Boating and Water Safety.
Article 1. Boating Safety Act.

§ 75A-1.
Declaration of policy.

It is the policy of this State to promote safety for persons and property in and connected with the use, operation, and equipment of vessels, and to promote uniformity of laws relating thereto.

History.

1959, c. 1064, s. 1.

§ 75A-2.
Definitions.

As used in this Chapter, unless the context clearly requires a different meaning:

“Abandoned vessel” means a vessel that has been relinquished, left, or given up by the lawful owner without the intention to later resume any right or interest in the vessel. The term does not include a vessel that is left by an owner or agent of the owner with any person or business for the purpose of storage, maintenance, or repair and that is not subsequently reclaimed.

(1a)

“Certificate of number” means the document and permanent identification number issued by the Wildlife Resources Commission for the purpose of registering a vessel in this State.

(1b)

“Commission” means the Wildlife Resources Commission.

(1c)

“Director” means the Executive Director of the Wildlife Resources Commission.

(1d)

“Electric generating facility” means any plant facilities and equipment used for the purposes of producing, generating, transmitting, delivering, or furnishing electricity for the production of power.

(1e)

“Motorboat” means any vessel equipped with propulsion machinery of any type, whether or not the machinery is the principal source of propulsion: Provided, that “propulsion machinery” as used in this section shall not include an electric motor when used as the only means of mechanical propulsion of any vessel.

(1f)

“No-wake speed” means idle speed or slow speed creating no appreciable wake.

“Operate” means to navigate or otherwise use or occupy any motorboat or vessel that is afloat.

“Owner” means a person, other than a lienholder, having the property in or title to a vessel. The term includes a person entitled to the use or possession of a vessel subject to an interest in another person, reserved or created by agreement and securing payment or performance of an obligation, but the term excludes a lessee under a lease not intended as security.

“Person” means an individual, partnership, firm, corporation, association, or other entity.

(4a)

“Underway” means a vessel that is not at anchor, or made fast to the shore, or aground.

“Vessel” means every description of watercraft or structure, other than a seaplane on the water, used or capable of being used as a means of transportation or habitation on the water.

“Waters of this State” means any waters within the territorial limits of this State, and the marginal sea adjacent to this State and the high seas when navigated as a part of a journey or ride to or from the shore of this State, but does not include private ponds as defined in

G.S. 113-129

.

Redesignated as subdivision (1d).

History.

1959, c. 1064, s. 2; 1965, c. 634, s. 1; 1969, c. 87; 1975, c. 340, s. 1; 1983, c. 446, s. 1; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 753, s. 2; 2006-185, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-185, s. 1, effective January 1, 2007, and applicable to offenses committed on or after January 1, 2007, added subdivisions (1), (1a), (1b), and (1c); redesignated former subdivision (1) as present subdivision (1e); in subdivision (1e), substituted “the machinery” for “such machinery” near the beginning and deleted “: Provided further, that the term ‘motorboat’ shall not include a vessel which has a valid marine document issued by the Bureau of Customs of the United States government or any federal agency successor thereto” following “any vessel” at the end; added subdivision (1f); in subdivision (2), substituted “any” for “a” and deleted “vessel, and shall be applicable to any motorboat or” preceding “vessel”; added subdivision (4a); and transferred the provisions of former subdivision (7) to subdivision (1d).

§ 75A-3.
Wildlife Resources Commission to administer Chapter; Boating Safety Committee; funds for administration.

The Commission shall enforce and administer the provisions of this Chapter.

The chair of the Commission shall designate from among the members of the Commission three members who shall serve as the Boating Safety Committee of the Commission, and who shall, in their activities with the Commission, place special emphasis on the administration and enforcement of this Chapter.

The Boating Account is established within the Wildlife Resources Fund created under

G.S. 143-250

. Interest and other investment income earned by the Account accrues to the Account. All moneys collected pursuant to the numbering and titling provisions of this Chapter shall be credited to this Account. Motor fuel excise tax revenue is credited to the Account under

G.S. 105-449.126

. The Commission shall use revenue in the Account, subject to the Executive Budget Act and the Personnel Act, for the administration and enforcement of this Chapter; for activities relating to boating and water safety including education and waterway marking and improvement; and for boating access area acquisition, development, and maintenance. The Commission shall use at least three dollars ($3.00) of each one-year certificate of number fee and at least nine dollars ($9.00) of each three-year certificate of number fee collected under the numbering provisions of

G.S. 75A-5

for boating access area acquisition, development, and maintenance. The Commission shall transfer on a quarterly basis fifty percent (50%) of each one-year certificate of number fee and fifty percent (50%) of each three-year certificate of number fee collected under the numbering provisions of

G.S. 75A-5

to the Shallow Draft Navigation Channel Dredging and Aquatic Weed Fund established by

G.S. 143-215.73

F.

History.

1959, c. 1064, s. 3; 1961, c. 644; 1963, c. 1003; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1182, s. 2; 1993, c. 422, s. 1; 1995, c. 390, s. 13; 1999-392, s. 5; 2006-185, s. 1; 2007-485, s. 4.1; 2013-360, s. 14.22(a); 2013-380, s. 3; 2014-100, s. 14.19(b); 2016-94, s. 14.12(b).

State Government Reorganization.

The Wildlife Resources Commission was transferred to the Department of Natural and Economic Resources (now the Department of Environmental Quality) by former G.S. 143A-118, enacted by Session Laws 1971, c. 864.

§ 75A-4.
Identification numbers required.

Every vessel on the waters of this State shall be numbered, except those vessels exempted from numbering under

G.S. 75A-7

. No person shall operate or give permission for the operation of any vessel on the waters of this State unless all of the following conditions are met:

The vessel is numbered in accordance with this Chapter, or in accordance with applicable federal law, or in accordance with a federally approved numbering system of another state.

The certificate of number awarded to the vessel is in full force and effect.

The identification number set forth in the certificate of number is displayed on each side of the bow of the vessel.

History.

1959, c. 1064, s. 4; 1983, c. 446, s. 1; 1999-392, s. 1; 2006-185, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-185, s. 1, effective January 1, 2007, and applicable to offenses committed on or after January 1, 2007, substituted “the waters of this State unless all of the following conditions are met:” for “such waters unless the” at the end of the introductory paragraph; in subdivision (1), added the subdivision designation, added “The” at the beginning, and substituted “state.” for “state, and unless” at the end; redesignated former subdivisions (1) and (2) as present subdivisions (2) and (3), respectively; in subdivision (2), substituted “the vessel” for “such vessel” and substituted “effect.” for “effect, and”; and, in subdivision (3), substituted “identification” for “identifying” at the beginning and substituted “the vessel” for “such vessel” at the end of subdivision (3).

§ 75A-5.
Application for certificate of number; fees; reciprocity; change of ownership; conformity with federal regulations; records; award of certificates; renewal of certificates; transfer of partial interest; destroyed or junked vessels; abandonment; change of address; duplicate certificates; display.

Application for Certificate of Number. — The owner of each vessel requiring numbering by this State shall file an application for a certificate of number with the Commission. The Commission shall furnish application forms and shall prescribe the information contained in the application form. The application shall be signed by the owner of the vessel or the owner’s agent and shall be accompanied by a fee, as set out in subsection (a1) of this section. The fee does not apply to vessels owned and operated by nonprofit rescue squads if they are operated exclusively for rescue purposes, including rescue training. The owner shall have the option of selecting a one-year numbering period or a three-year numbering period. Upon receipt of the application in approved form, the Commission shall enter the application in its records and issue the owner a certificate of number stating the identification number awarded to the vessel and the name and address of the owner, and a validation decal indicating the expiration date of the certificate of number. The owner shall paint on or attach to each side of the bow of the vessel the identification number and validation decals in such manner as may be prescribed by rules of the Commission in order that it may be clearly visible. The identification number shall be maintained in legible condition. The certificate of number shall be pocket size and shall be available for inspection on the vessel for which the certificate is issued at all times the vessel is in operation. Any person charged with failing to so carry a certificate of number shall not be convicted if the person produces in court a certificate of number previously issued to the owner that was valid at the time of the alleged violation.

(a1)

Fees. —

The fees for certificates of number are as set out in this subsection:

The fee for a certificate of number for a one-year period is:

Thirty dollars ($30.00) for a vessel that is less than 26 feet in length.

Fifty dollars ($50.00) for a vessel that is 26 feet or more in length.

The fee for a certificate of number for a three-year period is:

Ninety dollars ($90.00) for a vessel that is less than 26 feet in length.

One hundred fifty dollars ($150.00) for a vessel that is 26 feet or more in length.

Reciprocity. — The owner of any vessel already covered by a number in full force and effect pursuant to federal law or a federally approved numbering system of another state shall record the identification number prior to operating the vessel on the waters of this State in excess of the 90-day reciprocity period provided for in G.S. 75A-7(a)(1). The recordation shall be made pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, except that no additional or substitute identification number shall be issued.

Change of Ownership. — Should the ownership of a vessel change, a new application form with a fee in the amount set in subsection (a1) of this section shall be filed with the Commission and a new certificate bearing the same identification number shall be awarded to the new owner in the same manner as an original certificate of number. Possession of the certificate shall in cases involving prosecution for violation of any provision of this Chapter be prima facie evidence that the person whose name appears on the certificate is the owner of the vessel referred to on the certificate.

Conformity With Federal Regulations. — In the event that an agency of the federal government shall have in force an over-all system of identification numbering for vessels within the United States, the numbering system employed pursuant to this Chapter by the Commission shall be in conformity therewith.

Repealed by Session Laws 2006-185, s. 1.

Records. — All records of the Commission made or kept pursuant to this section are public records.

Award of Certificates. — Each certificate of number awarded pursuant to this Chapter, unless sooner terminated or discontinued in accordance with the provisions of this Chapter, shall continue in full force and effect to and including the last day of the month during which the certificate was awarded after the lapse of one year in the case of a one-year certificate or three years in the case of a three-year certificate. No person shall willfully remove a validation decal from any vessel during the continuance of its validity or alter, counterfeit, or otherwise tamper with a validation decal attached to any vessel for the purpose of changing or obscuring the indicated date of expiration of the certificate of number of the vessel.

Renewal of Certificates. — An owner of a vessel awarded a certificate of number pursuant to this Chapter shall renew the certificate on or before the first day of the month after which the certificate expires; otherwise, the certificate shall lapse and be void until renewed. Application for renewal shall be submitted on a form approved by the Commission and shall be accompanied by a fee in the amount set in subsection (a1) of this section.

Transfer of Partial Interest. — The owner shall furnish the Commission notice of the transfer of any part of the owner’s interest other than the creation of a security interest in a vessel numbered in this State pursuant to subsections (a) and (b) of this section within 15 days of the transfer. A transfer of partial interest in a vessel shall not affect the owner’s right to operate the vessel, nor shall a transfer of partial interest in a vessel terminate the certificate of number.

(i1)

Destroyed or Junked Vessels. —

The owner of any destroyed or junked vessel shall furnish the Commission notice of the destruction or junking of that vessel within 15 days of its occurrence. Destruction or junking terminates the certificate of number and renders the hull identification number invalid for that vessel.

(i2)

Abandonment. —

A person may acquire ownership of an abandoned vessel by providing proof to the Commission that the lawful owner has actually abandoned the vessel. The Commission shall adopt rules by which a person seeking to acquire ownership may demonstrate that the vessel is actually abandoned. At a minimum, the rules shall provide for a reasonable attempt to locate the lawful owner and, if the owner is located, notice by the claimant of an intention to claim ownership of the vessel.

Change of Address. — Whenever any person, after applying for or obtaining the certificate of number of a vessel, moves from the address shown in the application or upon the certificate of number, that person shall notify the Commission of the change of address within 30 days of moving in a form acceptable to the Commission.

(j1)

Duplicate Certificates. —

The Commission shall issue a duplicate certificate of number for a vessel upon application by the person entitled to hold the certificate, if the Commission is satisfied that the original certificate of number has been lost, stolen, mutilated, or destroyed, or has become illegible. The Commission shall charge a fee of five dollars ($5.00) for issuance of each duplicate certificate.

Display. — No number other than the identification number set forth in the certificate of number or granted reciprocity pursuant to this Chapter shall be painted, attached, or otherwise displayed on either side of the bow of a vessel, except the validation decal required by subsection (a) of this section.

Repealed by Session Laws 2006-185, s. 1.

History.

1959, c. 1064, s. 5; 1961, c. 469, s. 1; 1963, c. 470; 1975, c. 483, ss. 1, 2; 1977, c. 566; 1979, c. 761, ss. 1-7; 1981, c. 161; 1983, c. 194; c. 446, ss. 1, 2; 1987, c. 827, s. 4; 1993, c. 422, ss. 2-4; c. 539, ss. 563, 564; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 1998-225, s. 4.1; 1999-248, ss. 1, 2; 1999-392, ss. 2-4; 2006-185, s. 1; 2007-485, ss. 4.2, 4.3, 4.4; 2013-360, s. 14.22(b); 2019-204, s. 1; 2020-69, s. 4.

Cross References.

As to the issuance of permanent certificates of number to motorboats owned by governmental entities and nonprofit rescue squads, see

G.S. 75A-7

.

§ 75A-5.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-360, s. 14.22(c), effective October 1, 2013.

History.

1961, c. 469, s. 2; 1965, c. 957, s. 8; 1973, c. 1262, s. 86; 1977, c. 771, s. 4; 1983, c. 446, s. 2; 1989, c. 727, s. 218(16); 1993, c. 539, s. 565; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 1997-443, s. 11A.119(a); 1998-225, s. 4.2; 2006-185, s. 1; repealed by 2013-360, s. 14.22(c), effective October 1, 2013.

§ 75A-5.2.
Vessel agents.

In order to facilitate the convenience of the public, the efficiency of administration, the need to keep statistics and records affecting the conservation of wildlife resources, boating, water safety, and other matters within the jurisdiction of the Commission, and to facilitate vessel transactions, the Commission may conduct vessel transactions through any of the following:

Vessel agents.

The Commission’s headquarters.

Employees of the Commission.

Two or more of those sources simultaneously.

When there are substantial reasons for differing treatment, the Commission may conduct vessel transactions by one method in one locality and by another method in another locality.

As compensation for services rendered to the Commission and to the general public, vessel agents shall receive the surcharge listed below. The surcharge shall be added to the fee for each certificate issued.

Renewal of certificate of number — $3.00.

Transfer of ownership and certificate of number — $5.00.

Issuance of new certificate of number — $5.00.

Issuance of duplicate certificate of number — $3.00.

Issuance or transfer of certificate of title — $5.00.

When certificates of number are to be issued by vessel agents as provided by subsection (a) of this section, the Commission may adopt rules to provide for any of the following:

Qualifications of the vessel agents.

Duties of the vessel agents.

Methods and procedures to ensure accountability and security for proceeds and unissued certificates of number.

Types and amounts of evidence that a vessel agent must submit to relieve the agent of responsibility for losses due to occurrences beyond the control of the agent.

Any other reasonable requirement or condition that the Commission deems necessary to expedite and control the issuance of certificates of number by vessel agents.

The Commission may adopt rules to authorize the Director to take any of the following actions related to vessel agents:

Select and appoint vessel agents in the areas most convenient to the boating public.

Limit the number of vessel agents in any one area if necessary for efficiency of operation.

Require prompt and accurate reporting and remittance of public funds or documents by vessel agents.

Conduct periodic and special audits of accounts.

Suspend or terminate the authorization of any vessel agent found to be noncompliant with rules adopted by the Commission or when State funds or property are reasonably believed to be in jeopardy.

Require the immediate surrender of all equipment, forms, supplies, records, and State funds and property issued by or belonging to the Commission, in the event of the termination of a license agent.

The Commission is exempt from the contested case provisions of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes with respect to determinations of whether to authorize or terminate the authority of a person to conduct vessel transactions as a vessel agent of the Commission.

If any check or bank account draft of any vessel agent for the issuance of certificates of number shall be returned by the banking facility upon which the same is drawn for lack of funds, the vessel agent shall be liable to the Commission for a penalty of five percent (5%) of the amount of the check or bank account draft, but in no event shall the penalty be less than five dollars ($5.00) or more than two hundred dollars ($200.00). Vessel agents shall be assessed a penalty of twenty-five percent (25%) of their issuing fee on all remittances to the Commission after the fifteenth day of the month immediately following the month of sale.

It is a Class 1 misdemeanor for a vessel agent to do any of the following:

Withhold or misappropriate funds generated from vessel transactions.

Falsify records of vessel transactions.

Willfully and knowingly assist or allow a person to obtain a certificate of number or certificate of title for which the person is ineligible.

Willfully issue a backdated certificate of number or certificate of title.

Willfully include false information or omit material information on vessel transaction forms and records regarding either:

A person’s entitlement to a particular certificate of number or certificate of title.

The applicability or term of a particular certificate of number.

Charge or accept any fee, remuneration, or other item of value that exceeds the fee amounts provided by statute.

Charge or accept any additional fee, remuneration, or other item of value in association with any activity set out in subdivisions (1) through (5) of this subsection.

History.

2006-185, s. 1; 2013-283, s. 17.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-283, s. 17, effective January 1, 2014, in subsection (c), substituted “surcharge listed below” for “following specified commission from the statutory fee for each listed transaction” and added the last sentence; substituted “$3.00” for “1.25” in subdivision (c)(1); substituted “$3.00” for “0.50” in subdivision (c)(4); and substituted “$5.00” for “3.00” in subdivisions (c)(2), (c)(3) and (c)(5).

§ 75A-6.
Classification; rules.

Vessels subject to the provisions of this Chapter shall be divided into five categories as follows:

Class A. Less than 16 feet in length.

Class 1. Sixteen feet or over and less than 26 feet in length.

Class 2. Twenty-six feet or over and less than 40 feet in length.

Class 3. Forty feet or over and not more than 65 feet in length.

Class 4. More than 65 feet in length.

through (e) Repealed by Session Laws 1993, c. 361, s. 2.

(f)

through (j) Repealed by Session Laws 2006-185, s. 1.

(k)

Repealed by Session Laws 1993, c. 361, s. 2.

(
l
)

No person shall operate or give permission for the operation of a vessel that is not equipped as required by this section.

(m)

The Commission may adopt rules to conform to the Federal Boat Safety Act of 1971 and the federal regulations adopted pursuant thereto.

(n)

All vessels propelled by machinery of 10 hp or less that are operated on the public waters of this State shall carry at least one personal flotation device, life belt, ring buoy, or other device of the sort prescribed by rules of the Commission for each person on board, and from one-half hour after sunset to one-half hour before sunrise shall carry a white light in the stern or shall have on board a hand flashlight in good working condition, which light shall be ready at hand and shall be temporarily displayed in sufficient time to prevent collision.

(o)

The Commission for Public Health shall adopt rules establishing standards for sewage treatment devices and holding tanks for marine toilets installed in vessels operating on the inland fishing waters of the State as designated by the Commission and the inland lake waters of the State. The Commission shall not issue a certificate of number for any vessel operating on the inland fishing waters of the State as designated by the Commission and the inland lake waters of this State that is equipped with a marine toilet unless the vessel is provided with a sewage treatment device or holding tank approved by the Commission for Public Health. All vessels operating on the inland fishing waters of the State as designated by the Commission and the inland lake waters of the State that are equipped with a marine toilet shall provide a sewage treatment device or holding tank approved by the Commission for Public Health. Wildlife protectors may inspect vessels on the inland fishing waters of the State as designated by the Commission and the inland lake waters to determine if approved treatment devices or holding tanks are properly installed and if they are operating in a satisfactory manner. A vessel registered, documented, or otherwise licensed in another state and equipped with a marine toilet not prohibited in such state may be operated on the inland fishing waters of the State as designated by the Commission, without regard to the provisions of this subsection while making an interstate trip.

History.

1959, c. 1064, s. 6; 1963, c. 396; 1965, c. 634, s. 2; 1967, cc. 230, 1075; 1971, c. 296, ss. 1, 2; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1975, c. 340, s. 2; c. 483, s. 3; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1004, s. 55; 1993, c. 361, s. 2; 2006-185, s. 1; 2007-182, s. 2.

Local Modification.

Alexander, Burke, Caldwell: 1995, c. 19, s. 1; Catawba, Gaston, Iredell, and Lincoln: 1983, c. 200; McDowell: 1995, c. 19, s. 1; Mecklenburg: 1983, c. 200; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 944.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-185, s. 1, effective January 1, 2007, and applicable to offenses committed on or after January 1, 2007, rewrote the section.

Session Laws 2007-182, s. 2, effective July 5, 2007, substituted “Commission for Public Health” for “Commission for Health Services” three times in subsection (o).

§ 75A-6.1.
Navigation rules.

Every vessel operated on the waters of this State that is required to obtain an identification number pursuant to this Chapter, has a valid marine document issued by the federal Bureau of Customs or any federal agency successor to it, or issued pursuant to a federally approved numbering system of another state shall comply with the navigation rules, including requirements for navigational lights, sound-signaling devices, and other equipment, contained in the Inland Navigational Rules Act of 1980, codified as amended at 33 U.S.C. §§ 2001-2038, 2071-2073 (1993) and rules adopted pursuant thereto, see 33 C.F.R. Part 84 (1992).

The Commission is responsible for the enforcement of the rules specified in subsection (a) of this section. The rules specified in subsection (a) of this section are also enforceable by all peace officers with general subject matter jurisdiction.

Violation of any rule governing navigational lighting adopted by the Commission shall constitute an infraction as provided in

G.S. 14-3.1

.

History.

1993, c. 361, s. 1; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 14, s. 44; 2006-185, s. 1; 2013-360, s. 18B.15(a); 2013-380, s. 4.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-185, s. 1, effective January 1, 2007, and applicable to offenses committed on or after January 1, 2007, substituted “Chapter, has a valid marine document issued by the federal Bureau of Customs or any federal agency successor to it, or issued” for “Chapter or” near the beginning of subsection (a) and deleted “Wildlife Resources” preceding “Commission” at the beginning of the first sentence of subsection (b).

Session Laws 2013-360, s. 18B.15(a), effective December 1, 2013, substituted “an infraction as provided in

G.S. 14-3.1

” for “a Class 3 misdemeanor and is punishable only by a fine not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100.00)” in subsection (c). For effective date and applicability, see editor’s note.

Session Laws 2013-380, s. 4, effective December 1, 2013, rewrote subsection (c), which formerly read “Violation of the navigation rules specified in subsection (a) of this section shall constitute a Class 3 misdemeanor and is punishable only by a fine not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100.00).” For applicability, see editor’s note.

§ 75A-7.
Exemption from numbering requirements.

A vessel shall not be required to be numbered under this Chapter if it is:

A vessel that is required to be awarded an identification number pursuant to federal law or a federally approved numbering system of another state, and for which an identification number has been so awarded: Provided, that any such vessel shall not have been within this State for a period in excess of 90 consecutive days.

A vessel from a country other than the United States temporarily using the waters of this State.

A vessel whose owner is the United States, a state or a subdivision thereof.

A ship’s lifeboat.

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-360, s. 14.22(d), effective October 1, 2013.

A sailboat of not more than 14 feet on the load water line (LWL).

A vessel with no means of propulsion other than drifting or manual paddling, poling, or rowing.

The Commission is hereby empowered to permit the voluntary numbering of vessels owned by the United States, a state or a subdivision thereof.

Those vessels owned by the United States, a state or a subdivision thereof and those owned by nonprofit rescue squads may be assigned a certificate of number bearing no expiration date but which shall be stamped with the word “permanent” and shall not be renewable so long as the vessel remains the property of the governmental entity or nonprofit rescue squad. If the ownership of any such vessel is transferred from one governmental entity to another or to a nonprofit rescue squad or if a vessel owned by a nonprofit rescue squad is transferred to another nonprofit rescue squad or governmental entity, the Commission shall issue a new permanent certificate of number, displaying the same identification number, without charge to the successor entity. When any such vessel is sold to a private owner or is otherwise transferred to private ownership, the applicable certificate of number shall be deemed to have expired immediately prior to the transfer. Prior to further use on the waters of this State, the new owner shall obtain a certificate of number pursuant to the provisions of this Chapter. The provisions of this subsection applicable to a vessel owned by a nonprofit rescue squad apply only to a vessel operated exclusively for rescue purposes, including rescue training.

History.

1959, c. 1064, s. 7; 1981, c. 162; 1983, c. 446, ss. 1-3; 2006-185, s. 1; 2013-360, s. 14.22(d).

Cross References.

As to allowing nonprofit rescue squads to apply for numbers without payment of a fee, see

G.S. 75A-5

.

§ 75A-8.
Vessel liveries.

An owner of a vessel livery shall not rent a vessel to any person unless the provisions of this Chapter have been complied with. An owner of a vessel livery shall equip all vessels rented as required by this Chapter.

History.

1959, c. 1064, s. 8; 1975, c. 340, s. 3; 1983, c. 446, s. 1; 2006-185, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-185, s. 1, effective January 1, 2007, and applicable to offenses committed on or after January 1, 2007, substituted “Vessel” for “Boat” in the section catchline; and rewrote the section.

§ 75A-9.
Muffling devices.

Every internal combustion engine used on a vessel shall have effective muffling equipment installed and used on the exhaust to muffle the noise in a reasonable manner. The use of cutouts is prohibited.

Every internal combustion engine with an open-air exhaust that is used on a vessel that has a capacity of operating at more than 4,000 revolutions per minute shall have effective muffling equipment installed and used on each exhaust manifold stack. This subsection shall not apply to a licensed commercial fishing vessel.

This section shall not apply to vessels competing in a regatta or race approved by the United States Coast Guard, for such vessels while on trial runs during a period not to exceed 48 hours immediately preceding the regatta or race, and for such vessels while competing in official trials for speed records during a period not to exceed 48 hours immediately following the regatta or race.

History.

1959, c. 1064, s. 9; 2006-185, s. 1.

Local Modification.

Catawba, Iredell, Lincoln, and Mecklenburg (Lakes Norman, Wylie and Mountain Island only): 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1266.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-185, s. 1, effective January 1, 2007, and applicable to offenses committed on or after January 1, 2007, designated the existing provisions as subsection (a); rewrote subsection (a); and added subsections (b) and (c).

§ 75A-9.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2006-185, s. 1, effective January 1, 2007, and applicable to offenses committed on or after January 1, 2007.

§ 75A-10.
Operating vessel or manipulating water skis, etc., in reckless manner; operating, etc., while intoxicated, etc.; depositing or discharging litter, etc.

No person shall operate any motorboat or vessel, or manipulate any water skis, surfboard, or similar device on the waters of this State in a reckless or negligent manner so as to endanger the life, limb, or property of any person.

No person shall manipulate any water skis, surfboard, nonmotorized vessel, or similar device on the waters of this State while under the influence of an impairing substance.

(b1)

No person shall operate any vessel while underway on the waters of this State:

While under the influence of an impairing substance, or

After having consumed sufficient alcohol that the person has, at any relevant time after the boating, an alcohol concentration of 0.08 or more.

(b2)

The fact that a person charged with violating this subsection is or has been legally entitled to use alcohol or a drug is not a defense to a charge under subsections (b) and (b1) of this section. The relevant definitions contained in

G.S. 20-4.01

shall apply to subsections (b), (b1), and (b2) of this section.

(b3)

A person who violates a provision of subsection (a) or (b) of this section is guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor.

(b4)

A person who violates subsection (b1) of this section is guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor, and upon conviction, in addition to any other penalty imposed, shall be fined not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00).

No person shall place, throw, deposit, or discharge or cause to be placed, thrown, deposited, or discharged on the waters of this State or into the inland lake waters of this State, any litter, raw sewage, bottles, cans, papers, or other liquid or solid materials which render the waters unsightly, noxious, or otherwise unwholesome so as to be detrimental to the public health or welfare or to the enjoyment and safety of the water for recreational purposes.

No person shall place, throw, deposit, or discharge or cause to be placed, thrown, deposited, or discharged on the waters of this State or into the inland lake waters of this State any medical waste as defined by

G.S. 130A-290

which renders the waters unsightly, noxious, or otherwise unwholesome so as to be detrimental to the public health or welfare or to the enjoyment and safety of the water for recreational purposes.

A person who willfully violates subsection (d) of this section is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor. A person who willfully violates subsection (d) of this section and in so doing releases medical waste that creates a substantial risk of physical injury to any person who is not a participant in the offense is guilty of a Class F felony which may include a fine not to exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) per day of violation.

History.

1959, c. 1064, s. 10; 1965, c. 634, s. 3; 1985, c. 615, ss. 1-5; 1989, c. 742, s. 1; 1995, c. 506, s. 14; 2006-185, s. 1; 2013-380, s. 5; 2016-34, s. 3.

§ 75A-10.1.
Family purpose doctrine applicable.

The family purpose doctrine, as applicable in this State to tort cases arising from the operation of motor vehicles, shall apply to tort cases arising from the operation of motorboats and vessels as those terms are defined in this Chapter.

History.

1971, c. 450, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For note discussing the extension of the family purpose doctrine to motorcycles and private property, see 14 Wake Forest L. Rev. 699 (1978).

For note on use of the family purpose doctrine when no outsiders are involved, in light of Carver v. Carver,

310 N.C. 669

, 314 S.E.2d 739 (1984), see 21 Wake Forest L. Rev. 243 (1985).

§ 75A-10.2.
Proof of ownership of a vessel.

In all actions to recover damages for injury to the person or to property or for the death of a person, arising out of an accident or collision involving a vessel, proof of ownership of such vessel at the time of the accident or collision shall be prima facie evidence that the vessel was being operated and used with the authority, consent and knowledge of the owner in the very transaction out of which the injury or cause of action arose.

Proof of the certificate of number stating the identification number awarded to the vessel in the name of any person, firm, or corporation as required by this Chapter, or proof of the licensing, registration, or documentation of the vessel as required by other state or federal law in the name of any person, firm, or corporation, shall for the purpose of any such action, be prima facie evidence of ownership and that the vessel was then being operated by and under the control of a person for whose conduct the owner was legally responsible, for the owner’s benefit, and within the course and scope of the operator’s employment.

History.

1971, c. 652, s. 1; 2006-185, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-185, s. 1, effective January 1, 2007, and applicable to offenses committed on or after January 1, 2007, substituted “vessel” for “motorboat” in the section catchline; in subsection (a), substituted “a vessel,” for “motorboats or vessels as said terms are described in

G.S. 75A-2

,” deleted “motorboat or” preceding “vessel”, substituted “the accident” for “such accident” near the middle, substituted “the vessel” for “said motorboat or vessel” in the middle, and substituted “the injury” for “said injury” near the end; and, in subsection (b), inserted “identification” near the beginning, deleted “motorboat or” preceding “vessel”, substituted “the vessel” for “said motorboat or vessel” twice in the middle, substituted “the operator’s” for “his” at the end, and made punctuation changes.